District of Columbia statutes.
50-205

Bicycle safety enhancements for District-owned, heavy-duty vehicles.

(a)

The Mayor shall:

(1)

Equip all District-owned, heavy-duty vehicles with the following:

(A)

Blind-spot mirrors;

(B)

Reflective blind-spot warning stickers; and

(C)

[Not Funded].

(2)

Require that operators of District-owned, heavy-duty vehicles receive bicycle and pedestrian safety training from a curriculum and instructors that are approved by the District Department of Transportation.

(b)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this section within 180 days of March 25, 2009.

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-352, § 2, 56 DCR 1115

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined, as of February 15, 2012, that the fiscal effect of section 2(a)(1)(C) of Law 17-352 has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan. Therefore, the provisions of this section, enacted by Law 17-352, are not in effect.

Section 4 of D.C. Law 17-352 provided that section 2(a)(1)(C) shall apply upon inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.